Utah statutes.
75-7-816.   Recitals when title to real property is in trust -- Failure.

(1)  When title to real property is granted to a person as trustee, the terms of the trust may be given either:

(a)  in the deed of transfer; or

(b)  in an instrument signed by the grantor and recorded in the same office as the grant to the trustee.

(2)  If the terms of the trust are not made public as required in Subsection (1), a conveyance from the trustee is absolute in favor of purchasers for value who take the property without notice of the terms of the trust.

(3)  The terms of the trust recited in the deed of transfer or the instrument recorded under Subsection (1)(b) shall include:

(a)  the name of the trustee;

(b)  the address of the trustee; and

(c)  the name and date of the trust.

(4)  Any real property titled in a trust which has a restriction on transfer described in Section 25-6-14 shall include in the title the words "asset protection trust."



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

